California statutes. Public Resources Code
(D) Those entities in which an entity referred to in subparagraph (C) has the rights or powers listed in subparagraph (B).

(E) Those entities in which two or more entities as referred to in subparagraphs (A) to (D), inclusive, jointly have the rights or powers listed in subparagraph (B).

(t) “Producer responsibility organization” or “PRO” means an organization that is exempt from taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986, is formed for the purpose of implementing a plan to meet the requirements of this chapter, and is approved by the department.

(u) “Producer responsibility plan” or “plan” means the plan developed by the PRO for the collection, transportation, repair, recycling, and the safe and proper management of covered products pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 42984.8 and submitted to the department for approval pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 42984.8.

(v) “Recycle” or “recycling” has the same meaning as set forth in paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of subdivision (aa) of Section 42041. To be considered recycled, covered products shall be recycled into new, reused, or reconstituted products.

(w) “Repair” means any alteration or improvement of damaged covered product deemed worth the cost of repair by criteria established by the plan, including, but not limited to, any of the following:

(1) Redesigning and repurposing.

(2) Mending rips, holes, seams, and hems.

(3) Removing and repairing surface damage, such as pilling, stain removal, or abrasion.

(4) Securing and reattaching
 buttons and other fastenings.

(5) Dyeing, redyeing, overdyeing, or printing of images on covered products.

(6) Preparation for reuse and resale.

(x) “Responsible end market” has the same meaning as set forth in subdivision (ad) of Section 42041.

(y) “Retailer” means a person who sells or offers for sale a covered product in or into the state to a person through any means, including, but not limited to, sales outlets, catalogs, the telephone, the internet, or any electronic means.

(z) “Reuse” means the resale of a collected covered product to a consumer for its original intended use with or without repair.

(aa) “Secondhand
 covered product” means any covered product that has been previously owned by a consumer.

(ab) “Secondhand markets” means a retailer who sells secondhand covered products, including, but not limited to, thrift stores, collection box operators, online resale platforms, and flea markets.

(ac) “Sell” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 6006 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(ad) “Stewardship program” means a program established by a PRO pursuant to this chapter for the free, convenient, and safe collection, transportation, repair, recycling, and otherwise proper management of covered products.

(ae) (1) “Textile article” means an item customarily used in households or businesses that are made entirely or primarily from a
 natural, artificial, or synthetic fiber, yarn, or fabric. For purposes of this chapter, “textile article” includes only blankets, curtains, fabric window coverings, knitted and woven accessories, towels, tapestries, bedding, tablecloths, napkins, linens, and pillows.

(2) “Textile article” does not include single-use products including paper towels, paper napkins, toilet paper, facial tissue, and wet or dry wipes.

(af) “Third-party seller” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 1749.8 of the Civil Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 173.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Producers [42984.4. - 42984.5.]

42984.4.

(a) (1) Producers of covered products shall form and join a PRO for the purposes of complying with this chapter. The governing body of the PRO shall submit an application to the department by January 1, 2026, describing how the PRO meets the requirements to be an approved PRO pursuant to this chapter. If the department approves the PRO, the PRO shall proceed to carry out the requirements of this chapter. If applications for more than one PRO are submitted to the department, the department shall determine which proposed PRO can most effectively implement this chapter.

(2) The department shall, by, March 1, 2026, approve a PRO that meets the requirements of this chapter and both of the following:

(A) The PRO has a governing board consisting of producers that are diverse in size and type and that represent the diversity of covered products placed in the market by those entities. The governing board may include ex officio members involved in the collection, sorting, repair, reuse, recycling, or management of covered products.

(B) The PRO demonstrates that it has adequate financial responsibility and financial controls in place, including fraud prevention measures and an audit schedule, to ensure proper management of funds.

(3) All producers of covered products shall, by July 1, 2026, join the PRO approved by the department.

(4) After January 1, 2035, upon the determination of the director that an additional PRO would be beneficial in satisfying the
 requirements of this chapter, the department may approve additional PROs that meet the requirements of this chapter and that meet all of the following requirements:

(A) The proposed PRO submits to the department, and agrees to cover the department’s reasonable costs to review, a petition to establish a new PRO.

(B) The proposed PRO is composed of a sufficient number of producers to jointly comply with the requirements of this chapter.

(C) The proposed PRO agrees to cover the costs of all of the provisions of this chapter applicable to the proposed PRO and its participant producers.

(b) Each producer covered under a PRO shall register with that PRO in accordance with the procedures and requirements established by that PRO and shall comply with those
 procedures and requirements.

(c) Upon approval of a plan pursuant to Section 42984.8, or commencing July 1, 2030, whichever is sooner, a producer shall be subject to penalties under Section 42984.21 unless all of the following are met:

(1) The producer is a participant of the PRO.

(2) All covered products are accounted for in the plan.

(3) If an entity does not meet the definition of a producer and is not subject to this chapter before January 1, 2030, but, at any point, after January 1, 2030, meets the definition of a producer, the producer shall, within 90 days, become a participant of the PRO and comply with the requirements of this chapter.

(d) A producer is not in compliance with this
 chapter and is subject to penalties pursuant to this chapter if a covered product sold or offered for sale by the producer is not subject to an approved PRO plan that has been approved by the department pursuant to Section 42984.8.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 864, Sec. 1.   (SB 707)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

42984.5.

(a) No later than 30 days after the effective date of the regulations implementing this chapter, individual producers or the PRO shall provide to the department, in a form and manner established by the department, a list of brands of covered products that each producer sells, distributes for sale, imports for sale, or offers for sale in or into the state.

(b) A producer or PRO shall update the list described in subdivision (a) and provide the updated list to the department on or before January 15 of each year or upon request of the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 864, Sec. 1.   (SB 707)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Producer Responsibility Organizations (PROs) [42984.6. - 42984.7.]

42984.6.

(a) (1) A PRO shall prepare the initial statewide needs assessment designed to determine the necessary steps and investment needed for covered products, to achieve the requirements of this chapter. Needs assessments, or components thereof, shall be updated every five years or as necessary to ensure the requirements of this chapter are met. An initial needs assessment for covered products shall be completed before the completion and approval of any producer responsibility plan for covered products. The PRO may select an independent third-party contractor to complete the needs assessment.

(2) A PRO shall cover the cost of developing any needs assessment and any update to a needs assessment.

(3) A PRO may prepare more than one needs assessment, with each assessment specific to one or more covered products subject to this chapter, or may prepare one comprehensive needs assessment that includes all covered products subject to this chapter.

(4) A PRO shall consult with the department and local jurisdictions when preparing the needs assessment.

(5) The initial needs assessment, and any updates, shall be submitted to the department by March 1, 2027. The department shall review and approve, conditionally approve, or disapprove the needs assessment as meeting the requirements of this chapter within 90 days of submission.

(6) If there is more than one PRO approved by the department at the time updated needs assessments are completed, then the approved
 PROs may collaborate on a single needs assessment.

(b) A needs assessment shall comply with all of the following:

(1) Be designed to inform the program budget and PRO plan.

(2) Include an evaluation of all of the following with respect to covered products and covered product categories:

(A) Existing scope and scale of annual covered products diverted to landfill in the state by type of covered product, material composition, and volume and annual covered product recovery diverted to reuse, repair, or recycling in the state or from the state by type of covered product, material composition, and volume.

(B) The current repair, reuse, recycling, collection, sorting, and hauling system in the
 state and the expanded access and additional repair, reuse, recycling, collection, sorting, disassembly, and hauling options needed to meet the requirements of this chapter.

(C) Current market conditions and the need to create responsible and economically viable end markets in the state, regionally, and globally.

(D) Existing state statutory provisions and funding sources related to market development and financial incentives to help achieve the state’s goals related to repair, reuse, recycling, collection, sorting, disassembly, and hauling.

(E) Consumer education needs and the methods by which the PRO can best reach consumers with educational messaging.

(F) Consumer behaviors to drive repair, reuse, and recycling and to achieve the requirements of this
 chapter.

(G) Funding needs and incentive mechanisms necessary to achieve the requirements of this chapter, including coverage of the operation of the stewardship program.

(H) Fee reduction or redistribution mechanisms necessary to achieve the requirements of this chapter, in a manner that equitably distributes the costs among participating producers that reflects production and sales volumes relevant to the California market. Fee reduction or redistribution mechanisms may consider existing producer collection, repair, reuse, and recycling programs that help achieve the purpose of this chapter.

(I) Actions and investments necessary to provide sufficient access to collection, recycling, composting, processing, and transportation to responsible and economically viable end markets.

(J) An evaluation of the availability or lack of availability of responsible end markets for recycled covered products, the need to incentivize reused products or recycled material market development, and the associated investments and actions needed to ensure that the covered products are reused or recycled and have responsible and economically viable and sufficient end markets.

(K) The needs assessment shall include an evaluation of the factors contributing to the presence of perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances (PFAS) and other chemicals regulated under Chapter 6.6 (commencing with Section 25249.5) of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code and Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 108945) of, and Chapter 13.5 (commencing with Section 108970) of, Part 3 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code, and the actions and investments needed to avoid contamination related
 to recycling. This shall include available environmental and public health data and an evaluation of the available end markets for recycled material that cannot be remanufactured into textiles or textile articles in California.

(L) Whether allowing more than one PRO would be beneficial in meeting the requirements of the chapter.

(M) Evaluate what factors will be important to successfully implement the eco-modulated fee structure required by subdivision (b) of Section 42984.10, and what associated data collection will be necessary as part of the plan.

(c) The department shall guide development of a needs assessment, which shall be developed by a PRO in consultation with a broad diversity of local jurisdictions, recycling service providers, and processors that reflect the different needs and challenges presented by
 managing different covered products through final disposition.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 864, Sec. 1.   (SB 707)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

42984.7.

(a) A PRO shall approve collection sites under its stewardship program that agree to comply with all applicable state, federal, or municipal laws, regulations, and rules and conditions adopted by the PRO.

(b) A PRO shall include as a collection site under its stewardship program any local jurisdiction that offers in writing to participate in the stewardship program and agrees to comply with any PRO requirements that are consistent with that PRO’s approved plan even if the minimum thresholds described in subdivision (d) of Section 42984.10, as applicable, have been achieved.

(1) A PRO shall include the local jurisdiction as a collection site in the stewardship program within 90
 days of receiving the written offer to participate, confirming that the local jurisdiction will comply with any PRO requirements that are consistent with an approved plan, even if the minimum thresholds described in subdivision (d) of Section 42984.10, as applicable, have been achieved.

(2) The PRO shall not be required to respond to offers pursuant to this paragraph until the PRO’s plan has been approved by the department.

(c) A PRO may suspend or terminate a collection site that does not comply with all applicable state, federal, or municipal laws and regulations or adhere to the rules and conditions imposed by the PRO.

(d) A collection site shall be operated and managed to ensure that covered products are collected safely and handled in accordance with all applicable state, federal, and municipal laws and
 regulations and the rules and conditions of the plan. Authorized collectors and authorized sorters may divert reusable covered products for sale in secondhand markets.

(e) A PRO shall require all contractors to pay at least the state minimum wage.

(f) Each participant of a PRO with an approved plan shall comply with the requirements of this chapter. The PRO shall notify the department within 30 calendar days of any the following:

(1) The end of any three-month period in which the PRO unsuccessfully attempted to obtain a fee, records, or information from a participant producer, or received incomplete or incorrect records or information.

(2) The date a producer no longer participates in the PRO’s approved plan.

(3) Any instance of noncompliance by a participant producer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 864, Sec. 1.   (SB 707)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Producer Responsibility Plan for Covered Products [42984.8. - 42984.12.]

42984.8.

(a) Within 12 months of the effective date of the regulations adopted by the department pursuant to Section 42984.2, a PRO shall develop and submit to the department a complete plan, in a form and manner determined by the department, in accordance with the requirements of this chapter, for the collection, transportation, repair, sorting, recycling, and the safe and proper management of covered products in the state. No PRO serving more than one producer may limit its stewardship plan for covered products to the covered products of the producers participating in that stewardship program.

(b) The department shall review the stewardship plan for compliance with this chapter and shall approve, disapprove, or conditionally approve the plan
 within 120 days of receipt of the plan.

(c) (1) If the department disapproves a plan submitted by a PRO, the department shall explain how the plan does not comply with this chapter and provide written notice to the PRO within 60 days of disapproval. The PRO may resubmit to the department a revised plan within 30 days of the date the written notice was issued, and the department shall review the revised plan within 60 days of resubmittal.

(2) If the department disapproves a revised plan submitted by a PRO, the department shall explain how the plan does not comply with this chapter and provide written notice to the PRO within 60 days of disapproval. The PRO shall then revise and resubmit the plan consistent with the department’s direction within 30 days, otherwise the disapproval is final and the PRO and producers may be subject to penalties.

(3) By July 1, 2030, a PRO shall have a complete plan approved by the department and each producer shall be subject to an approved plan to be in compliance with this chapter.

(d) Within three months of approval by the department, a PRO shall begin to implement the approved plan.

(e) A PRO with an approved plan shall submit any proposed substantial change to the plan to the department for approval employing the procedures set forth in this section.

(f) The approved plan shall be a public record, except that financial or sales data reported to the department by the PRO is not a public record for purposes of the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code) and shall not be open to public
 inspection. The department may release financial or sales data in summary form only so the information cannot be attributable to a specific producer or distributor or to any other entity.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 864, Sec. 1.   (SB 707)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

42984.9.

The PRO shall fully implement the approved plan within 12 months of the department’s approval of the plan pursuant to Section 42984.8.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 864, Sec. 1.   (SB 707)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

42984.10.

A plan for covered products shall be designed to accept and manage all postconsumer covered products and shall include all of the following:

(a) The names and contact information, including email address, phone number, and mailing and physical addresses, of producers and brands of covered products covered under the plan.

(b) (1) A description of the method to establish and administer a means for fully funding the PRO in a manner that distributes the PRO’s costs among the producers that are part of the stewardship organization using a per unit eco-modulated fee that reflects California sales volumes, existing producer collection, repair, reuse, and recycling programs that help achieve the purpose of
 this chapter, and the cost of reusing, repairing, recycling, or otherwise managing covered products pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 42984.4.

(2) A five-year budget that establishes a funding level sufficient to operate the PRO in a prudent and responsible manner. The budget shall demonstrate how estimated revenues will cover all budgeted costs for each cost category.

(3) Budgeted costs shall include, but not be limited to, administrative costs, education and outreach costs, operational costs, capital costs, and a reserve to operate the PRO should there be unexpected events, such as losses of income, and large unbudgeted expenses in order to protect the recycling infrastructure the PRO relies upon in its plan, during any lapse in producer participation during the life of the program. The plan shall include a description of the types of activities related to each line-item
 cost category. The reserve cost category shall include a reserve level amount and description justifying the reserve level amount indicated.

(4) The PRO shall maintain reserve funds sufficient to operate the plan for no less than six months. If a new plan submitted by a PRO is approved by the department, the PRO shall establish its reserve and maintain the required reserve fund balance by the end of the second year of plan operation.

(5) Administrative costs shall include the department’s actual and reasonable regulatory costs, which include full personnel costs, to implement and enforce this chapter as the criteria for all the costs that are defined in the regulations adopted pursuant to Section 42984.2. For the purposes of this paragraph, PRO implementation begins once the department approves a PRO’s plan, except the department’s costs shall include actual regulatory development
 costs and other startup costs incurred prior to plan submittal and approval.

(c) Quantifiable five-year and annual performance standards and metrics unless or until the department publishes performance standards pursuant to Section 42984.19. The PRO shall amend its plan to meet or exceed the performance standards published by the department.

(d) A description of how the PRO will provide for a free and convenient dropoff or collection system for covered products, which shall include permanent collection sites and may include temporary collection sites and mail-back options, in each county of the state that meets both of the following requirements:

(1) Provides for a minimum of 10 permanent collection sites or one permanent collection site per 25,000 people, whichever is greater, except as provided below:

(A) A county with a population of 18,000 and under, as reported annually by the Department of Finance, shall have a minimum of three collection locations.

(B) A county with a population of between 18,001 and 50,000, inclusive, as reported annually by the Department of Finance, shall have a minimum of four collection locations.

(C) A county with a population between 50,001 and 100,000, inclusive, as reported annually by the Department of Finance, shall have a minimum of eight collection locations.

(2) Provides for a reasonable geographic spread of permanent collection sites and an explanation for the geographic spread.

(e) A description of how collection sites will be authorized and managed,
 including all of the following:

(1) A description of the process by which local jurisdictions can request to be a collection site pursuant to Section 42984.7.

(2) A description of how the PRO will provide to collection sites at no cost the appropriate containers for covered products, training, signage, safety guidance, and educational materials.

(3) An explanation of the process by which the PRO will provide for the transport of covered products at no cost from the collection sites to an authorized sorter, or directly to an authorized repair business, or recycling facility.

(4) A description of how collection sites will be allowed to divert collected covered products to secondhand markets for reuse. Any diversion by collection sites pursuant to this
 paragraph shall be consistent with the rules established pursuant to paragraph (5).

(5) A list of all proposed rules, conditions, and requirements for authorized collectors, authorized sorters, and authorized repair businesses, including a template proposed agreement for each of those types of entities, as applicable.

(6) A description of how the PRO will prioritize the use of secondhand markets and nonprofit thrift stores, as described in Section 6363.3 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, when establishing collection sites to meet the minimum requirements in subdivision (d).

(7) How collection sites will be instructed to identify and reject counterfeit covered products.

(f) (1) A description of the process by which collected covered
 products will be sorted, transported, processed, reused, and recycled following collection at collection sites, including all of the following:

(2) A description of how covered products will be handled and managed according to the waste management practices pursuant to Section 40051, including both of the following:

(A) (i) How the plan will prioritize the reuse, including repair, of collected covered products.

(ii) Products designed for use by infants and children under 12 years of age with components that pose a risk of detachment, thus creating choking hazards, or containing components subject to Part 1303 (commencing with Section 1303.1) and Part 1307 (commencing with Section 1307.1) of Title 16 of the Code of Federal Regulations, including, but not limited to, metallic, vinyl, or plastic
 snaps, zippers, grommets, closures, or appliqués may be excluded from repair and reuse by the PRO.

(B) (i) How the plan will include the incentive payments, grants, and market development investments specified in clause (vii) to encourage reuse over recycling and other methods.

(ii) A description of how covered products will be sorted by authorized sorters, including a description of how the flow of covered products to and from authorized collectors, authorized sorters, authorized repair businesses, and recyclers will be tracked through final disposition.

(iii) A description of how the PRO will maximize the reuse and recycling of all covered products.

(iv) A description of how the PRO will minimize disposal of covered products
 collected by the PRO.

(v) A description of how the PRO will prioritize, to the extent feasible, the use and development of sorting, repair, and recycling facilities located closer to the point of collection to minimize transportation-related emissions and increase accountability for the ultimate disposition of the covered products.

(vi) A description of the annual assessment the PRO will conduct and the metrics it will use to determine how collection, sorting, and transportation outcomes aligned with projections.

(vii) A description of how the plan will provide incentive payments, grants, and market development investments to support the infrastructure necessary to effectively implement the plan, including how incentive payments, grants, and market development investments will prioritize infrastructure closer to the
 point of generation pursuant to clause (v).

(viii) A description of how the actions taken pursuant to clause (vii) will ensure that covered products are reused or recycled and have responsible and economically viable end markets.

(g) A comprehensive statewide education and outreach program designed to educate consumers and promote participation in the program offered by the PRO. At a minimum, the comprehensive statewide education and outreach program shall include all of the following:

(1) A description of the education and communications for strategy being implemented to effectively promote participation in the stewardship program and provide the information necessary for effective participation by consumers, retailers, distributors, wholesalers, local jurisdictions, and others.

(2) A joint internet website in coordination with all other PROs, as applicable, that publicizes the location of collection sites and provides information to consumers on how to drop off covered products at the free and convenient network of collection sites offered by the PRO, including any information reasonably necessary to safely and conveniently access the collection, repair, and recycling services offered by the PRO.

(3) Signage that is prominently displayed and easily visible.

(4) All signage and materials required for collection sites by the PRO, and the method by which collection sites can access replacement materials at no cost to the collection site.

(5) A description of efforts to support participation by all California communities, including a
 description of efforts to communicate with consumers in languages other than English.

(6) Promotional materials or activities, or both, that explain the purpose of the PRO and the means by which it is being carried out.

(7) A description of how the PRO will encourage users to separate products that are not covered products from covered products, when appropriate, before submitting the covered products to an authorized collection site or mail-back program.

(8) Materials designed to inform third-party sellers on online platforms of their duty to comply with the law and how to join the PRO.

(9) Information to the public on secondhand markets and the benefits of reuse, including repair.

(10) (A) The statewide education and outreach program shall promote the safe and proper management of covered products, including information on where consumers can purchase repaired and reused covered products. This includes education and training for authorized collectors to incentivize domestic resale of usable covered products.

(B) The statewide education and outreach program shall not promote the disposal of covered products in a manner inconsistent with the services offered by the plan.

(C) The statewide education and outreach plan shall include information for consumers about how to avoid improper disposal of covered products.

(h) A description of the strategies, goals, and metrics the PRO will use to annually assess and evaluate the efficacy of the comprehensive statewide
 education and outreach program.

(i) A description of how the PRO will coordinate with other PROs to avoid confusion to the public regarding program activities, including, but not limited to, education and outreach, including establishing point-of-sale messaging, a joint website, and toll-free telephone number for purposes of providing information on the program.

(j) Coordination with, and a description of the efforts and methods used to coordinate activities with, all of the following entities who are responsive to a request from the PRO:

(1) Other PROs.

(2) Existing collection, reuse, and recycling programs.

(3) Community-based organizations, including nonprofit thrift stores as described
 in Section 6363.3 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, that contact the PRO and that are qualified to run or support collection events.

(k) A contingency plan in the event the plan expires or is revoked. The contingency plan shall guarantee that the contracts, financial data, and other necessary authority and assets to operate the program shall vest in a trustee approved by the department. The trustee shall operate the most recently approved plan, subject to the direction of the department, until such time as a new plan is approved. Upon plan expiration or revocation of the plan, the balance of the PRO’s operating reserves collected pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) shall be transferred to the control of the trustee within five calendar days. All documents, digital records, contracts, and files related to the operation of the plan shall be transferred to the control of the trustee within five calendar days.

(l) Develop a program to support laundries for laundering covered products that includes funding for technology that reduces water consumption and improves microfiber and microplastic filtration.

(m) A description of how the plan will address the presence of PFAS and other chemicals regulated under Chapter 6.6 (commencing with Section 25249.5) of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code and Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 108945) of, and Chapter 13.5 (commencing with Section 108970) of, Part 3 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code, including, but not limited to, the actions and investments needed to avoid contamination in the recycling process and available end markets for recycled material that cannot be remanufactured into textiles or textile articles in California.

(n) Develop strategies to address
 design challenges for covered products, including, but not limited to, compostability, reduction and removal of harmful chemicals, microfiber and microplastic shedding, and mixed material blends.

(o) A description of how the PRO will minimize the negative environmental and human health impacts of all operations associated with the plan, including impacts from collected covered products exported outside of California.

(p) A process by which the financial activities of the PRO or individual producers that are related to implementation of the plan will be subject to an independent audit consistent with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 174.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

42984.11.

(a) A producer of a covered product sold, offered for sale, imported, or distributed in or into the state shall achieve the performance standards pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 42984.10.

(b) After March 1, 2032, a producer of a covered product sold, offered for sale, imported, or distributed in or into the state shall achieve the performance standards adopted by the department pursuant to Section 42984.19.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 864, Sec. 1.   (SB 707)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

42984.12.

(a) A PRO shall review its plan at least every five years after approval by the department and determine whether revisions to the plan are necessary.

(b) If a PRO determines that revisions to the plan are necessary, the PRO shall submit to the department a revised plan for review and approval employing the procedures set forth in Section 42984.8. The stewardship organization shall submit the revised plan to the department pursuant to this subdivision at least 12 months prior to the review deadline outlined in subdivision (c). The revised plan shall include a cover letter that summarizes the revisions to the plan within 90 days of the review deadline outlined pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) If a PRO determines that no revisions to the plan are necessary, the PRO shall send a letter to the department 12 months prior to the review deadline outlined in subdivision (a), explaining that the PRO has reviewed the plan and determined that no revisions are needed. The department may disapprove the PRO’s determination within 30 days of receipt of that determination if the department concludes that the PRO cannot implement the objectives of this chapter without revising the plan. If the department disapproves the PRO’s determination, the PRO shall submit to the department a revised plan for review and approval employing the procedures set forth in Section 42984.8. The PRO shall submit the revised plan pursuant to this subdivision within 60 days of receipt of the department’s disapproval, unless the department determines that additional time is needed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 864, Sec. 1.   (SB 707)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Financial Provisions  [42984.13. - 42984.14.]

42984.13.

(a) Each PRO shall pay all administrative and operational costs associated with establishing and implementing the program in which it participates, including, but not limited to, the cost of collection, transportation, sorting, repairing, recycling, and the safe and proper management of covered products.

(b) A PRO shall establish a method for fully funding the PRO in a manner that distributes the program’s costs among participating producers that reflects sales volumes and the eco-modulated fee criteria included in the plan pursuant to Section 42984.10. The funding mechanism shall demonstrate adequate funding for all administrative and operational costs of the program, to be borne by participating producers, and shall distribute
 participating producers’ costs in consideration of the cost of managing their specific covered products according to the approved plan.

(c) Within nine months of the effective date of the regulations, the department shall notify each PRO of its estimated regulatory costs as the criteria for those costs are defined in the regulations adopted pursuant to Section 42984.2, which includes full personnel costs, related to implementing and enforcing this chapter. This shall include the actual reasonable costs associated with regulation development pursuant to Section 42968.2 and other startup activities prior to plan submittal and approval.

(d) The PRO shall, on a schedule determined by the department, pay the department fees to cover the department’s incurred costs as described in subdivision (c). The fees shall not exceed the department’s actual and reasonable regulatory costs to
 implement and enforce this chapter.

(e) (1) The department shall deposit all moneys received from a PRO pursuant to this section into the Textile Stewardship Recovery Fund, which is hereby established in the State Treasury.

(2) Upon appropriation by the Legislature, moneys in the Textile Stewardship Recovery Fund shall be expended by the department to implement and enforce this chapter, as well as to reimburse any outstanding loans made from other funds used to finance regulation, development, and startup costs of the department’s activities pursuant to this chapter.

(3) The money in the Textile Stewardship Recovery Fund shall not be expended for any other purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 864, Sec. 1.   (SB 707)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

42984.14.

(a) Upon approval of the PRO’s plan, the PRO shall charge each participant producer annual fees that are eco-modulated as described in the plan. The intent of the eco-modulated fee is to incentivize design choices that facilitate the achievement of goals as outlined in the plan, including reuse, repair, and recycling through reduced fees, while using malus fees to disincentivize practices and materials incongruent with the plan. The PRO shall consider existing producer collection, repair, reuse, and recycling programs in developing the eco-modulated fee structure.

(b) The PRO shall account for the costs to ensure each covered product and covered product category meet the requirements of the chapter, including minimization of environmental
 and public health impacts along the entire supply chain of covered products or covered product category.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 864, Sec. 1.   (SB 707)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Records, Audits, and Reports  [42984.15. - 42984.18.]

42984.15.

(a) A PRO shall keep board minutes, books, and records that clearly reflect the activities and transactions of the PRO.

(b) A PRO shall include in its plan a process by which the financial activities of the organization or individual producers that are related to implementation of the plan will be subject to an independent audit consistent with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP), which shall be reviewed by the department.

(c) The department may audit the PRO or individual producer annually.

(d) Failure of a PRO or producer, or their respective agent who holds records, to produce documents or data
 that is requested by the department, required to be collected or generated to carry out operation of the plan in the form and manner determined by the department, as part of a department audit, or review of a third-party audit, constitutes a violation of this chapter.
